src/verb.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+A1pl +A1sg +A2pl +A2sg +A3pl +A3sg +Abl +Able +Acc +ActOf +Adamantly
+Adj +Adverb +AfterDoingSo +Agt +Aor +AsIf +AsLongAs +Become
+ByDoingSo +Caus +Cond +Cop +Dat +Desr +Equ +EverSince +FeelLike
+FitFor +Fut +FutPart +Gen +Hastily +Imp +Inf1 +Inf2 +Inf3 +Ins
+JustLike +Loc +Ly +Narr +Neces +Neg +Ness +Nom +NotAbleState
+NotState +Noun +Opt +P1pl +P1sg +P2pl +P2sg +P3pl +P3sg +Pass +Past
+PastPart +Pnon +Pos +Pres +PresPart +Prog1 +Prog2 +Pron +Prop +Recip
+Reflex +Rel +Related +Repeat +Since +SinceDoingSo +Stay +Verb +When
+While +With +Without +WithoutBeingAbleToHaveDoneSo
+WithoutHavingDoneSo +Zero ^DB

LEXICON Root
+Verb:gel	759;

LEXICON 759
!degil +Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
!degil +Cond:+ysA	452;
!degil +Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	#;
+Neg:+mA	409;
!degil +Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
!degil +Past:+ydH	380;
+Pos:0	185;
!degil +Pres+A3sg:0	#;
!degil +Pres:0	224;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg+Aor:+yAmA	758;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg+Imp+A2sg:+yAmA	#;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg+Imp:+yAmA	222;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg:+yAmA	260;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos+Imp+A2sg:+Ar	#;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos+Imp+A2sg:+Hr	#;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos+Imp+A2sg:+Ht	#;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos+Imp+A2sg:+dHr	#;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos+Imp+A2sg:+t	#;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos+Imp:+Ar	320;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos+Imp:+Hr	50;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos+Imp:+Ht	379;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos+Imp:+dHr	1;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos+Imp:+t	85;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos:+Ar	242;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos:+Hr	643;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos:+Ht	49;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos:+dHr	44;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos:+t	293;
^DB+Verb+Caus:+Ar	700;
^DB+Verb+Caus:+Hr	620;
^DB+Verb+Caus:+Ht	192;
^DB+Verb+Caus:+dHr	378;
^DB+Verb+Caus:+t	742;
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos+Imp+A2sg:+Hl	#;
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos+Imp+A2sg:+Hn	#;
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos+Imp:+Hl	410;
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos+Imp:+Hn	8;
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos:+Hl	443;
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos:+Hn	581;
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos:+HnHl	451;
^DB+Verb+Pass:+Hl	319;
^DB+Verb+Pass:+Hn	221;
^DB+Verb+Pass:+HnHl	752;
^DB+Verb+Recip+Pos+Imp+A2sg:+HS	#;
^DB+Verb+Recip+Pos+Imp:+HS	2;
^DB+Verb+Recip+Pos:+HS	84;
^DB+Verb+Recip:+HS	551;
^DB+Verb+Reflex+Pos+Imp+A2sg:+Hn	#;
^DB+Verb+Reflex+Pos+Imp:+Hn	590;
^DB+Verb+Reflex+Pos:+Hn	589;
^DB+Verb+Reflex:+Hn	7;

LEXICON 758
(+z)	757;
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+zsHnHz	#;
+A2sg:+zsHn	#;
+A3pl:+zlAr	753;
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 757
+A3pl:+lAr	755;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cond:+ysA	756;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	754;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 756
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;
+A2sg:+n	#;

LEXICON 755
+Cond:+ysA	#;

LEXICON 754
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 753
+Cond:+ysA	#;

LEXICON 752
+Neg+Aor:+mA	748;
+Neg+Imp+A2sg:+mA	#;
+Neg+Imp:+mA	751;
+Neg:+mA	746;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg+Aor:+yAmA	749;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg+Imp+A2sg:+yAmA	#;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg:+yAmA	750;

LEXICON 751
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 750
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;

LEXICON 749
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 748
(+z)	747;
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 747
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;

LEXICON 746
+Fut:+yAcAk	745;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	744;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adverb+AsLongAs:+dHkCA	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 745
+A1sg:+yHm	#;

LEXICON 744
+Past:+ydH	743;

LEXICON 743
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 742
+Neg+Aor:+mA	701;
+Neg+Imp+A2sg:+mA	#;
+Neg+Imp:+mA	720;
+Neg:+mA	707;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg+Aor:+yAmA	725;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg:+yAmA	731;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos+Imp+A2sg:+dHr	#;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos:+dHr	722;
^DB+Verb+Caus:+dHr	741;
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos+Imp:+Hl	708;
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos:+Hl	719;
^DB+Verb+Pass:+Hl	739;

LEXICON 741
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos:+Hl	740;

LEXICON 740
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+ByDoingSo:+yArAk	#;

LEXICON 739
+Neg+Aor:+mA	733;
+Neg+Imp+A2sg:+mA	#;
+Neg+Imp:+mA	738;
+Neg:+mA	735;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg+Aor:+yAmA	736;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg:+yAmA	737;

LEXICON 738
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 737
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 736
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 735
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	734;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AsLongAs:+dHkCA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 734
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 733
(+z)	732;
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 732
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;

LEXICON 731
+Fut:+yAcAk	729;
+Narr:+mHS	727;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	730;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	728;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+When:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 730
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 729
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 728
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A2sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 727
+A3pl:+lAr	726;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 726
+Cop:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 725
(+z)	724;
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+zsHnHz	#;
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 724
+Cond:+ysA	723;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 723
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 722
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	721;
+Prog2+A3sg:+mAktA	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;

LEXICON 721
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 720
+A2pl:+yHn	#;
+A3pl:+sHnlAr	#;

LEXICON 719
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	714;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Desr+A3sg:+sA	#;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	713;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	711;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	709;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	715;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	712;
+Prog2+A3sg:+mAktA	#;
+Prog2:+mAktA	718;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AfterDoingSo:+yHp	#;
^DB+Adverb+ByDoingSo:+yArAk	#;
^DB+Adverb+When:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutHavingDoneSo:+mAdAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutHavingDoneSo:+mAksHzHn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg+Pnon:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Verb+Able:+yAbil	717;

LEXICON 718
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 717
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	716;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;

LEXICON 716
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;

LEXICON 715
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 714
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 713
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 712
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 711
+A3pl:+lAr	710;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 710
+Cop:+dHr	#;
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 709
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 708
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 707
+Desr:+sA	704;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Narr:+mHS	702;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Opt:+yA	706;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	705;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	703;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 706
+A1pl:+lHm	#;

LEXICON 705
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 704
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 703
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 702
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 701
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A3pl:+zlAr	#;
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 700
+Neg+Aor:+mA	645;
+Neg+Imp+A2sg:+mA	#;
+Neg+Imp:+mA	660;
+Neg:+mA	652;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg+Aor:+yAmA	679;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg:+yAmA	682;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos+Imp:+t	644;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos:+t	694;
^DB+Verb+Caus:+t	678;
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos+Imp:+Hl	653;
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos:+Hl	659;
^DB+Verb+Pass:+Hl	699;

LEXICON 699
+Neg+Imp+A2sg:+mA	#;
+Neg:+mA	696;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg:+yAmA	698;

LEXICON 698
+Narr:+mHS	697;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg:+yHS	#;

LEXICON 697
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 696
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	695;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AsLongAs:+dHkCA	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 695
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 694
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	688;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Desr:+sA	691;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	687;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	684;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Opt:+yA	690;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	689;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	685;
+Prog2+A3sg:+mAktA	#;
+Prog2:+mAktA	693;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AfterDoingSo:+yHp	#;
^DB+Adverb+ByDoingSo:+yArAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 693
+Cop:+dHr	692;

LEXICON 692
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 691
+A3pl:+lAr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 690
+A1pl:+lHm	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;

LEXICON 689
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 688
+A1sg:+Hm	#;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 687
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	686;

LEXICON 686
+Narr:+mHS	#;

LEXICON 685
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;

LEXICON 684
+A3pl:+lAr	683;

LEXICON 683
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 682
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	680;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	681;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 681
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 680
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 679
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 678
+Neg+Imp+A2sg:+mA	#;
+Neg+Imp:+mA	666;
+Neg:+mA	663;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg+Aor:+yAmA	670;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg:+yAmA	672;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos:+dHr	667;
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos:+Hl	665;
^DB+Verb+Pass:+Hl	677;

LEXICON 677
+Neg+Aor:+mA	674;
+Neg:+mA	675;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg:+yAmA	676;
